Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.82.010

State shared excises.

A code city shall collect, receive and share in the distribution of state collected and distributed excise taxes to the same extent and manner as general laws relating thereto apply to any class of city or town including, but not limited to, funds distributed to cities under *RCW 82.36.020 relating to motor vehicle fuel tax, RCW 82.38.290 relating to use fuel tax, and RCW * 82.36.275 and ** 82.38.080(3).

[ 1998 c 176 s 2; 1995 c 274 s 4; 1985 c 7 s 102; 1983 c 3 s 74; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.82.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Chapter 82.36 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2013 c 225 s 501, effective July 1, 2016.

**(2) RCW 82.38.080 was amended by 2013 c 225 s 111, deleting subsection (3), effective July 1, 2016. See RCW 82.38.080(1)(f).